Indiana, session 2026, HB1328.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 16-18-2-2.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]: Sec. 2.5. "Administered drug", for purposes of
IC 16-21-20, has the meaning set forth in IC 16-21-20-2.
SECTION 2. IC 16-18-2-223.9 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 223.9. "Medicare reimbursement
rate", for purposes of IC 16-21-20, has the meaning set forth in
IC 16-21-20-3.
SECTION 3. IC 16-21-20 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW CHAPTER TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]:
Chapter 20. Billing for Administered Drugs
Sec. 1. This chapter does not apply to the following:
(1) A critical access hospital that meets the criteria under 42
CFR 485.601 through 42 CFR 485.647.
(2) The Medicaid program.
2026 IN 1328—LS 6862/DI 147


Sec. 2. As used in this chapter, "administered drug" means a
drug delivered to the body of a person by injection, infusion,
ingestion, or any other means.
Sec. 3. As used in this chapter, "Medicare reimbursement rate"
refers to the rate the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid
Services pays for a drug or biological product under Medicare Part
B.
Sec. 4. (a) Except as provided in subsection (b), a hospital
licensed under this article may not submit a bill for an
administered drug in an amount that exceeds the lesser of the
following:
(1) One hundred twenty percent (120%) of the Medicare
reimbursement rate for the administered drug.
(2) The amount the hospital bills for the administered drug on
June 30, 2026.
(b) If the Medicare reimbursement rate for an administered
drug increases, a hospital may submit a bill for an administered
drug that exceeds the amount described in subsection (a)(2) only in
an amount that does not exceed the percentage increase in the
Medicare reimbursement rate applied to the amount billed by the
hospital for the drug on June 30, 2026.
Sec. 5. A hospital shall update the Medicare reimbursement rate
for each administered drug on:
(1) January 1; and
(2) July 1;
of each year based on the Medicare reimbursement rate published
by the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services for the
most recent calendar quarter.
2026 IN 1328—LS 6862/DI 147